Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 1

Election of Commissioners

6-20-101. Number and terms of commissioners — Election by districts.

In all cities that adopt chapters 18-22 of this title, commissioners as provided for in this charter shall be elected in the manner prescribed in this chapter.

If such city or territory has a population of five thousand (5,000) or more according to the last federal census, there shall be elected at the first election five (5) commissioners, the three (3) receiving the highest number of votes to hold office for four (4) years, and the other two (2) for two (2) years. If such city or territory has a population of less than five thousand (5,000) according to the last federal census, there shall be elected at the first election three (3) commissioners, the two (2) receiving the highest number of votes to hold office for four (4) years and the third for two (2) years. The term of all commissioners thereafter elected shall be for four (4) years, or until their successors are elected and qualified. Any such city that has a population of not less than two thousand nine hundred twenty (2,920) nor more than two thousand nine hundred twenty-two (2,922), according to the federal census of 1960 or any subsequent federal census, five (5) commissioners shall be elected as provided for cities of more than five thousand (5,000) population. The deadline for filing nominating petitions for the first commissioners is thirty-five (35) days before the incorporation election.

Any city having a population of less than five thousand (5,000) shall have the option of increasing the number of commissioners to five (5) by ordinance. In the next regular city election after the adoption of such an ordinance, voters shall be entitled to vote for three (3) commissioners, or four (4) commissioners, as the case may be, and at the same election the approval of the ordinance shall also be submitted to the voters. If a majority of those voting on the ordinance shall be for approval and the number of commissioners to be elected is three (3), the two (2) receiving the highest number of votes shall hold office for four (4) years, and the third for two (2) years. If the number of commissioners to be elected is four (4), the two (2) receiving the highest number of votes shall hold office for four (4) years, and the other two (2) for two (2) years. The terms of all commissioners thereafter elected shall be for four (4) years, or until their successors are elected and qualified. If a majority of those voting on the ordinance shall not be for approval, the ordinance shall be null and void, and the results of the election shall be certified as though the election were for one (1) commissioner, or two (2) commissioners, as the case may be, and as though no ordinance had been adopted. Any city that has previously adopted an ordinance approved by the voters pursuant to this subsection (c) increasing the number of commissioners from three (3) to five (5), may, after six (6) years, adopt an ordinance to decrease the number of commissioners from five (5) to three (3) following the same procedure. If a majority of those persons voting on the ordinance shall be for approval, then the number of commissioners shall be reduced to three (3). Any such ordinance providing for a decrease in the number of commissioners shall not operate to abbreviate the term of office of any elected commissioner.

An ordinance increasing the number of commissioners to five (5) may also be submitted to the voters in an election on the question that the board of commissioners directs the county election commission to hold. At such election, voters shall be entitled to vote for two (2) commissioners to serve until the next regular city election. If a majority of those voting on the ordinance shall be for approval, the two (2) candidates for commissioner receiving the highest number of votes shall be declared elected. At the next regular city election if the number of commissioners to be elected is four (4), the three (3) receiving the highest number of votes shall hold office for four (4) years, and the fourth for two (2) years; if the number of commissioners to be elected is three (3), they shall hold office for four (4) years. The terms of all commissioners thereafter elected shall be for four (4) years, or until their successors are elected and qualified. If a majority of those voting on the ordinance in the special election shall not be for approval, the ordinance and the election of the two (2) commissioners shall be null and void.

Notwithstanding subsections (a)-(d), a city with a population of not less than six hundred (600) nor more than six hundred twenty-five (625) persons, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, located in a county with a population in excess of seven hundred thousand (700,000) persons, also according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall elect all commissioners at one time for a four-year term so that the city may be spared the expense of conducting elections every two (2) years. In order to effectuate this provision, all commissioners to be elected at the 1983 election shall be elected to a two-year term only, to serve until the 1985 election at which time, and every four (4) years thereafter, all commissioners shall be elected to four-year terms. Subsection (e) shall have no effect unless approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the governing body of any municipality to which it may apply.

Cities that have adopted § 6-20-201(a)(3) to provide for popular election of the mayor shall have two (2) or four (4) commissioners as the case may be under subsection (b) or (c).

Notwithstanding subsections (a)-(f), any city incorporated under or adopting this charter may, by ordinance, choose to elect the members of the board of commissioners by district. If the board chooses to elect commissioners by district, the board shall by ordinance create contiguous single-member districts equal to the number of commissioners. The districts shall be equitably apportioned according to population. The establishment of the districts and the fixing of their boundaries shall be accomplished not less than twelve (12) months prior to the regular city election at which commissioners are to be elected, and any change in district boundaries shall also be accomplished within this time limitation. The board shall, within ten (10) years from the initial establishment of districts and at least once in every ten (10) years thereafter, reapportion the districts so that the apportionment shall comply with the requirements of this section. One (1) commissioner shall be elected from each district of the city. The ordinance providing that the commissioners will be chosen by districts may provide that each district commissioner will be elected by the voters of the city at-large or by only the voters of the district. A person must reside in a district to run for or hold the office of commissioner from that district. The ordinance providing that commissioners will be chosen by district may also provide for transition provisions, including increasing the terms of the number of commissioners necessary so that the initial election from all districts shall take place at the same time. The ordinance may provide that all commissioners initially elected serve four-year terms or that some serve four (4) years and some serve two (2) years. If some are elected for two (2) years, their successors shall be elected for four (4) years, so that the commissioners have staggered terms. After the initial election, all commissioners shall be elected for four-year terms.

Any city having a population of more than twenty thousand (20,000), according to the last federal census, shall have the option of increasing the number of commissioners to seven (7) by ordinance. Upon adoption of such an ordinance, it shall be filed with the county election commission, which shall submit approval of the ordinance to the voters of the city at the next general election or regular city election that follows the filing period required pursuant to § 2-3-204(b). If a majority of those voting on the ordinance are not for approval, the ordinance shall be null and void. If a majority of those voting on the ordinance are for approval, then at the next regular city election, voters shall be entitled to vote for four (4) commissioners, or five (5) commissioners, as the case may be, in order to provide for a total of seven (7) commissioners. If the number of commissioners to be elected is four (4), each shall hold office for four (4) years. If the number of commissioners to be elected is five (5), the three (3) receiving the highest number of votes shall hold office for four (4) years, and the other two (2) for two (2) years. The terms of all commissioners thereafter elected shall be for four (4) years, or until their successors are elected and qualified. An ordinance approved by the voters pursuant to this section may not be repealed or amended.

In elections of commissioners in a city having a population of not less than five thousand seven hundred sixty (5,760) nor more than five thousand eight hundred eighty (5,880) which is located inside a county having a population of not less than eighty-nine thousand eight hundred (89,800) nor more than eighty-nine thousand nine hundred (89,900), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, commission positions shall be designated as Seat A, Seat B, Seat C, Seat D, or Seat E. Any candidate for the commission shall designate, upon qualifying for election, the particular designated seat that the candidate seeks. In each regular city election, all voters in the city may vote for one (1) candidate for each designated seat that is open by reason of the expiration of a commissioner's term.

Subdivision (i)(1) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the legislative body of any municipality to which it may apply.

In any city having a population of not less than seven thousand five hundred fifty (7,550) nor more than seven thousand eight hundred (7,800) that is located inside a county having a population of not less than one hundred eighty-three thousand one hundred (183,100) nor more than one hundred eighty-three thousand two hundred (183,200), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the board of commissioners shall be elected as follows:

In the 2020 election, the two (2) candidates receiving the highest number of votes are elected to four-year terms, and the candidate receiving the third highest number of votes is elected to a two-year term;

In the 2022 election, the two (2) candidates receiving the highest number of votes are elected to four-year terms, and the candidate for mayor receiving the highest number of votes is elected to a four-year term; and

In subsequent elections, all members of the board of commissioners shall be elected to four-year terms.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 2, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1997a125; Code 1932, § 3522; Acts 1963, ch. 114, § 1; 1967, ch. 79, § 1; 1968, ch. 438, § 1; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(32); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2001; Acts 1983, ch. 14, § 1; 1989, ch. 61, § 2; 1989, ch. 175, § 5; 2006, ch. 540, § 1; 2015, ch. 394, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 696, § 1; 2018, ch. 908, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment in (c), deleted the former fifth sentence which read “An ordinance approved by the voters may not be repealed or amended.” and added the current sixth and seventh sentences.

The 2016 amendment added (i).

The 2018 amendment added (j).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 394, § 3. July 1, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 696, § 2. March 24, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 908, § 3. May 3, 2018.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-20-102. Date of elections.

The first election of commissioners in any city under chapters 18-22 of this title shall be held on the fourth Tuesday following the election at which these chapters have been adopted. The board of commissioners shall fix the date of all subsequent elections; provided, that any date so designated shall fall within ninety (90) days of the annual anniversary of the first election of the board of commissioners.

In any city having a population of not less than three hundred seventy-five (375) nor more than four hundred twenty-five (425), in any county having a population of not less than twenty-eight thousand (28,000) nor more than twenty-eight thousand one hundred (28,100), all according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the board of commissioners shall fix the date of all subsequent elections; provided, that any date so designated shall be set at least one hundred twenty (120) days prior to the date such election is to be held. The presiding officer of the board of commissioners shall certify such election date, or any subsequent change thereto, to the secretary of state.

The board of commissioners may by ordinance change the date of municipal elections to coincide with the August or November general election. The ordinance changing the election date shall provide for the extension of the terms of members of the board necessary to meet the election date, but no term may be extended for more than two (2) years beyond its regular expiration date.

Nothing in subdivision (c)(1) shall be construed to remove any incumbent from office or abridge the term of any incumbent prior to the end of the term for which an elected official was selected.

If the board of commissioners changes the date of municipal elections pursuant to subdivision (c)(1), the board may at a later date change the election date back to what such date was prior to moving the election date to coincide with the August or November general election. The board may only make an election date change under this subdivision (c)(3) one (1) time. Terms of incumbent members of the board shall not be abridged to accomplish an election date change under this subsection (c); however, members elected at a date change pursuant to this subsection (c) may take office at a later date so as to not abridge terms of incumbent members. If such members take office at a later date, their term may be abridged due to such members having to take office at the later date.

In addition to the authority granted by subsections (a), (b) and (c), the board of commissioners of any municipality incorporated under the general laws of this state and having a population of not less than four hundred fifty (450) nor more than four hundred sixty (460), or not less than four hundred eight-five (485) nor more than four hundred ninety-four (494), that is located in any county having a population of not less than fifty-one thousand two hundred (51,200) nor more than fifty-one thousand three hundred (51,300), all according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, may, by an ordinance approved by an affirmative two-thirds (2/3) vote of its membership, fix the date of subsequent regular municipal elections as the date of the regular November election as defined in § 2-1-104, by one (1) of the following alternative methods specified in the ordinance:

The terms of office of the incumbent members of the board of commissioners and popularly-elected mayor, if there is one, that would have expired on the date of the first regular municipal election occurring after the adoption of the ordinance shall be extended to the date of the regular state November election occurring thereafter. The terms of office of the incumbent members of the board of commissioners and popularly-elected mayor, if there is one, that would have expired on the date of the second regular municipal election occurring after the adoption of the ordinance shall be extended to the date of the regular state November election occurring thereafter; or

The terms of incumbent members of the board of commissioners, and the popularly-elected mayor, if there is one, that expire six (6) months or less before a regular state November election, shall be extended to the date of that state election. The terms of members of the board of commissioners and the popularly-elected mayor, if there is one, that expire more than six (6) months before a regular state November election shall be filled at the regular city election pertinent to those offices for terms extending to the next regular state November election.

Members of the board of commissioners, and the popularly-elected mayor, if there is one, shall be elected for terms of four (4) years, except for the transitional term provided for in subdivision (d)(1)(B).

Nothing in this subsection (d) shall be construed to remove any incumbent from office or abridge the term of any incumbent prior to the end of the term for which an elected official was selected.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 2, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 1977a128; Code 1932, § 3525; Acts 1971, ch. 273, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2002; Acts 1982, ch. 898, § 1; 1985, ch. 79, § 1; 2007, ch. 44, § 1; 2010, ch. 1008, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of municipal charter amendment that extends term of elected officials, OAG 00-017, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/8/00).

6-20-103. Persons eligible as commissioners.

A qualified voter of the city, other than a person qualified to vote based only on nonresident ownership of real property under § 6-20-106(b), shall be eligible for election to the office of commissioner.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 4, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1997a134; Code 1932, § 3531; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2003; Acts 2001, ch. 1, § 1.

6-20-104. Disqualification from office.

No person shall become commissioner who has been convicted of malfeasance in office, bribery, or other corrupt practice, or crime, or of violating any of the provisions of § 6-20-108 in reference to elections. Any commissioner so convicted shall forfeit such commissioner's office.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 4, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1997a135; Code 1932, § 3532; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2004.

Cross-References. Bribery, title 39, ch. 16, part 1.

Misconduct of public officials and employees, title 39, ch. 16, part 4.

Prohibited election practices, title 2, ch. 19.

6-20-105. Calling elections.

The board of commissioners has the power by ordinance to direct the calling by the county election commission of municipal elections, including all elections respecting bond issues.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 2, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1997a126; Code 1932, § 3523; Acts 1970, ch. 403, § 1; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(33); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2005.

6-20-106. Qualifications of voters.

In any election of commissioners under this charter, registered voters of the city or territory may vote.

In cities having populations of not less than one thousand three hundred fifty (1,350) nor more than one thousand three hundred seventy-five (1,375), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, registered voters who own real property located in any such city shall be entitled to vote in all municipal elections and municipal referenda held in such city. In cases of multiple ownership of real property, no more than two (2) owners who are registered voters shall be eligible to vote under this subsection (b). This subsection (b) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the board of commissioners of any city to which it applies. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of such board and certified by such presiding officer to the secretary of state.

In cities having a population of not less than four thousand five hundred fifty (4,550) nor more than four thousand six hundred eight (4,608), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, all registered voters who own real property located in any such city shall also be entitled to vote in all municipal elections and municipal referenda held in such city.

In any city having a population of not less than one thousand nine hundred forty (1,940) nor more than two thousand (2,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, a registered voter who resides outside the boundaries of the city, but who owns at least eight thousand square feet (8,000 sq. ft.) of real property located within the boundaries of the city, shall be entitled to vote in all municipal elections and municipal referenda held in the city. In any case of multiple ownership of such real property, the nonresident voter must own at least one-half (½) interest of such property. This subsection (d) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the board of commissioners of any city to which it applies. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of such board and certified by such presiding officer to the secretary of state.

In municipalities having a population of not less than one thousand ten (1,010) and not more than one thousand fifteen (1,015), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, all registered voters who own real property located in any such municipality shall also be entitled to vote in all municipal elections and municipal referenda held in such city. In cases of multiple ownership of real property, no more than two (2) owners who are registered voters are eligible to vote under this subsection (e). This subsection (e) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the board of commissioners of any city to which it applies. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of such municipality and certified by the presiding officer to the secretary of state.

In any city incorporated under chapters 18-22 of this title having a population of not less than four hundred sixty (460) nor more than four hundred sixty-nine (469), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, registered voters who own real property located in any such city shall be entitled to vote in all municipal elections and municipal referenda held in such city; provided, that in cases of multiple ownership of real property, no more than two (2) owners who are registered voters shall be eligible to vote.

Subdivision (f)(1) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the board of commissioners of any city to which it applies. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the board and certified by the presiding officer to the secretary of state.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 2, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1997a126; Code 1932, § 3523; Acts 1970, ch. 403, § 1; 1971, ch. 261, § 1; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(34); 1976, ch. 846, §§ 1, 2; Private Acts 1978, ch. 263, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2006; Acts 1989, ch. 30, § 1; 1991, ch. 461, § 1; 1996, ch. 820, § 1; 2015, ch. 252, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 252, § 2. April 24, 2015.

Cross-References. Qualifications for right to vote, Tenn. Const., art. IV, § 1.

6-20-107. Declaration of results.

The county election commission shall determine and declare the results of the election. The requisite number of candidates receiving the highest number of votes shall be declared elected.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 2, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1997a127; Code 1932, § 3524; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(35); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2007.

6-20-108. Improper solicitation of political support.

No candidate for any office nor any other person shall, directly or indirectly, give or promise any person or persons any office, employment, money, benefit, or anything of value for the purpose of influencing or obtaining political support, aid, or vote for any candidate. Any person violating this section shall be punished by fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for each offense.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 22, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 1997a247; Code 1932, § 3645; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2009.

6-20-109. Beginning of terms of office.

The terms of all commissioners shall begin at the beginning of the first regularly scheduled meeting of the board of commissioners following the date of their election.

In any city having a population of not less than seven thousand five hundred fifty (7,550) nor more than seven thousand eight hundred (7,800) that is located inside a county having a population of not less than one hundred eighty-three thousand one hundred (183,100) nor more than one hundred eighty-three thousand two hundred (183,200), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the terms of all members of the board of commissioners begin at the beginning of the first regularly scheduled meeting of the board of commissioners in the month of January immediately following the date of the members' elections. The terms of the members of the board of commissioners in office on May 3, 2018, are extended until the first regularly scheduled meeting of the board of commissioners in the month of January following the election for which their seat is contested, but no term may be extended beyond four (4) years and two (2) months.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 2, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 1997a130; Code 1932, § 3527; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2010; Acts 1990, ch. 632, § 1; 2018, ch. 908, § 2.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 908, § 3. May 3, 2018.

6-20-110. Vacancies.

Any vacancy on the board occurring prior to a regular city election shall be filled by the remaining members of the board until that election. At the election, the remaining unexpired term shall be filled. No member shall be appointed under this section at any time when the board already has one (1) member so appointed. In the case of any additional vacancy, the board shall by ordinance or resolution, call upon the county election commission to call a special election for the purpose of filling such additional vacancy. If a city has chosen to elect commissioners from districts, any vacancy in a district commissioner's office shall be filled by the appointment or election of a qualified person who resides in the district.

If, within ninety (90) days of the occurrence of a vacancy, the vacancy has not been filled by the remaining members of the commission in accordance with subsection (a), then the mayor, or, if a vacancy exists in the position of mayor, then the city manager, or, if a vacancy exists in the positions of mayor and city manager, then the city recorder, shall notify the county election commission within five (5) business days following the passage of such ninety-day period. The county election commission shall call a special election for the purpose of filling the vacancy; provided, however, that such special election shall be held in conjunction with the next general election or city election, if such election is scheduled to occur more than seventy-five (75) days but less than one hundred twenty (120) days from the date the county election commission is notified of the unfilled vacancy.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 4, § 8; Shan. Supp., § 1997a142; Code 1932, § 3539; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(36); 1973, ch. 222, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2011; Acts 1989, ch. 175, § 6; 2005, ch. 255, § 1.

6-20-111. Term limits for mayor and board of commissioners.

Subject to the further provisions of this section, the board of commissioners of any municipality incorporated under this charter that is located within a county that has adopted a charter form of government is authorized, upon its own initiative and upon the adoption of an ordinance by a two-thirds (2/3) vote at two (2) separate meetings, to establish term limits for the mayor and the board of commissioners of such municipality in such manner as shall be designated by the ordinance. The operation of the ordinance shall be subject to approval of the voters as required in subsection (b).

Any ordinance to establish term limits for the mayor and board of commissioners of any municipality to which subsection (a) applies shall not become operative until approved in an election herein provided in the municipality. Upon the adoption of the ordinance, the mayor shall notify the county election commission to hold an election as provided in this subsection (b).

After the receipt of a certified copy of such ordinance, the county election commission shall hold an election on the question pursuant to § 2-3-204, providing options to vote “FOR” or “AGAINST” the ordinance, and a majority vote of those voting in the election shall determine whether the ordinance is to be operative.

If the majority vote is for the ordinance, it shall be deemed to be operative on the date that the county election commission makes its official canvass of the election returns; provided, however, that no term limits shall apply until the election of the mayor and board of commissioners held after the ordinance is operative.

If the majority vote is against the ordinance, no further elections on the question of term limits shall be held until at least four (4) years have expired from the previous election and only after the board of commissioners adopts a new ordinance for such purposes in accordance with subsection (a).

Any referendum required by this section may only be submitted to the voters at a regular August election, regular November election, or regularly scheduled municipal election.

Acts 2015, ch. 243, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 243, § 2. April 24, 2015.